Utah, session 2026, HB483.
Section 1. Section 11-46c-101 is enacted to read:46c. Regulation of Cut Flower Sales11-46c-101. Definitions.As used in this chapter:(1)"Cut flower" means a flower or flower bud that has been removed from the flower's or flower bud's parent plant.(2)"Political subdivision" means:(a)a municipality as that term is defined in Section 10-1-104; or(b)a county.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 11-46c-102 is enacted to read:11-46c-102. Actions allowed regarding cut flowers.(1)Subject to Subsection (2), if an ordinance, resolution, or policy of a political subdivision permits a person to grow flowers on the person's private property within the political subdivision's boundaries, the political subdivision shall permit the person to trade, sell, or otherwise transfer cut flowers from the flowers grown on the person's private property.(2)A political subdivision may require a business license for a person described in Subsection (1) to trade, sell, or otherwise transfer cut flowers, except that the political subdivision may not deny the issuance of a business license on the basis that the person grows flowers or is trading, selling, or transferring cut flowers.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.